Utah statutes.
49-16-701.   Volunteer firefighters eligible for line-of-duty death and
disability benefits in Division A -- Computation of benefit.
(1)  A volunteer firefighter is only eligible for line-of-duty death and line-
of-duty disability benefits provided for firefighters enrolled in Division A,
subject to Section 49-16-603.
(2)  The lowest monthly compensation of firefighters of a city of the first
class in this state at the time of death or disability shall be considered to
be the final average monthly salary of a volunteer firefighter for purposes of
computing these benefits.
(3)  Each volunteer fire department shall maintain a current roll of all
volunteer firefighters which meet the requirements of Subsection 49-16-102(10)
to determine eligibility for this benefit.
